Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB943.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1329 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1329. Valuation of acquired water and wastewater systems.* * *(f.1) Independent Fiscal Office documentation.--Before the commencement of a proceeding of a fair market value acquisition of a selling utility, the selling utility shall request, receive and make available, in-person and via a publicly accessible Internet website, the following documentation from the Independent Fiscal Office:(1) An analysis of the costs and benefits of maintaining the selling utility under its current ownership structure.(2) An analysis of the costs and benefits of the selling 12345678910111213141516171819 utility being acquired by an acquiring public utility under this section.(3) An analysis of the costs and benefits of the selling utility being acquired by an acquiring public utility under section 1327 (relating to acquisition of water and sewer utilities).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0943PN1010 - 2 - 12345678